Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-602 Manner and effect of rightful
rejection. (1) Rejection of goods must be within a reasonable time after
their delivery or tender. It is ineffective unless the buyer seasonably
notifies the seller.

(2) Subject to the provisions of the two following
sections on rejected goods (sections 490:2-603 and 490:2-604),

(a) After rejection any exercise of ownership by the
buyer with respect to any commercial unit is wrongful as against the seller;
and

(b) If the buyer has before rejection taken physical
possession of goods in which he does not have a security interest under the
provisions of this article (subsection (3) of section 490:2-711), he is under a
duty after rejection to hold them with reasonable care at the seller's
disposition for a time sufficient to permit the seller to remove them; but

(c) The buyer has no further obligations with regard
to goods rightfully rejected.

(3) The seller's rights with respect to goods
wrongfully rejected are governed by the provisions of this article on seller's
remedies in general (section 490:2-703). [L 1965, c 208, §2-602; HRS
§490:2-602]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next